Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1604
Life insurance; policy issued to a labor union or similar employee organization; requirements.

A policy issued to a labor union or similar employee organization, which shall be deemed the policyholder, to insure members of such union or organization for the benefit of persons other than the union or organization or any of its officials, representatives, or agents shall be subject to the following requirements:

(1) The members eligible for insurance under the policy shall be all of the members of the union or organization, or all of any class or classes thereof; and

(2) The premium for the policy shall be paid either from the union's or organization's funds or from funds contributed by the insured members specifically for their insurance or from both. A policy on which no part of the premium is to be derived from funds contributed by the insured members specifically for their insurance must insure all eligible members, except those who reject the coverage in writing, or all except any as to whom evidence of individual insurability is not satisfactory to the insurer.

Laws 1949, c. 150, § 1(3), p. 379;

Laws 1957, c. 192, § 3, p. 673;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 11.